test/src/gt-desc-yamls/Pron-kiae_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - kiä: # Pronoun (37) kiä 'eng who /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Nom: kiä
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Gen: kink
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Par: kedä
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ill: [kinkahe, kehe]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ine: [kinkan, kinkah, kinkahn, ken, keh, kehn]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ela: [kinkast, kest]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+All: [kinkalõ, kelle]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ade: [kinkal, kel]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Abl: [kinkalt, kelt]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Tra: [kinkas, kes]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Ter: [kinkaniq, keeniq]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Abe: [kinkaldaq, keldäq]
     kiä+Pron+Interr+SP+Com: kinkaq
